test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-kiitw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - kītõ: # Verb 53 'eng /est öelda/fin' - full paradigm
     kītõ+V+Inf: kītõ
     kītõ+V+Ger: kītõs
     kītõ+V+Sup: kītõm
     kītõ+V+Sup+Ine: kītõmõs
     kītõ+V+Sup+Ela: kītõmõst
     kītõ+V+Sup+Tra: kītõmõks
     kītõ+V+Sup+Abe: kītõmõt
     kītõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kītõb
     kītõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kītõt
     kītõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kītõbõd
     kītõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kītiz
     kītõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [kītizt, kītiztõ]
     kītõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [kītizt, kītiztõ]
     kītõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: kīt
     kītõ+V+Cond+Sg3: kītõks
     kītõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: kīt
     kītõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: kīt
     kītõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: kītõgid
     kītõ+V+Jus+Sg3: kītõg
     kītõ+V+Quo+Sg3: kītiji
     kītõ+V+ActPrfPrc: kītõn
     kītõ+V+PssPrfPrc: kītõd
